District of Columbia statutes.
5-335.03

Reporting requirement.

Beginning March 15, 2015, and on an annual basis thereafter, the Mayor shall submit a public report to the Council, identifying the total amount of money collected the previous year using the post-and-forfeit procedure and the number of criminal charges, by specific charge, resolved the previous year using the post-and-forfeit procedure.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 304
as added Apr. 24, 2015, D.C. Law 20-243, § 3(b), 61 DCR 8320